it: Commercio e industria > Piercing e tatuaggi > Prodotti per tatuaggi > Aghi per tatuaggi: Aghi per tatuaggio curvi Magnum; Aghi per tatuaggio Magnum; Aghi per tatuaggio con rivestimento rotondo; Aghi per tatuaggio Shader rotondi
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Xuyên và xăm > Mực xăm > Kim xăm: Kim xăm Curved Magnum; Kim xăm Magnum; Kim xăm Round Liner; Kim xăm Round Shader
nb: Forretninger og industri > Piercing og tatovering > Tatoveringsutstyr > Tatoveringsnåler: Buede magnum-tatoveringsnåler; Magnum-tatoveringsnåler; Runde linjetatoveringsnåler; Runde shadingtatoveringsnåler
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Piercing a tetování > Tetovací potřeby > Tetovací jehly: Tetovací jehly Curved Magnum (vyplňovače); Tetovací jehly Magnum (vyplňovače); Tetovací jehly Round Liner (kruhové linkovače); Tetovací jehly Round Shader (kruhové stínovače)
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Piercing a tetovanie > Tetovacie potreby > Tetovacie ihly: Zakrivené tetovacie ihly Magnum; Tetovacie ihly Magnum; Okrúhle ihly na tetovanie liniek; Okrúhle tetovacie ihly na tieňovanie
es: Economía e industria > Piercings y tatuajes > Instrumentos para tatuajes > Agujas para tatuajes: Agujas para tatuar Magnum curvas; Agujas para tatuar Magnum; Agujas para tatuar con revestimiento redondo; Agujas para tatuar redondas Shader
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Tatouages et piercings > Matériel de tatouage > Aiguilles de tatouage: Aiguilles de tatouage incurvées; Aiguilles de tatouage magnum; Aiguilles de tatouage de contour rondes; Aiguilles de tatouage d’ombrage rondes
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Piercing i tatuaże > Sprzęt do tatuażu > Igły do tatuażu: Igły do tatuażu CM (Curved Magnum); Igły do tatuażu MG (Magnum); Igły do tatuażu RL (Round Liner); Igły do tatuażu RS (Round Shader)
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Piercing ve Dövme > Dövme Sarf Malzemeleri > Dövme İğneleri: Kavisli Magnum Dövme İğneleri; Magnum Dövme İğneleri; Yuvarlak Liner Dövme İğneleri; Yuvarlak Shader Dövme İğneleri
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การเจาะและการสัก > อุปกรณ์สัก > เข็มสัก: เข็มสักหัวแม็กนั่มแบบโค้ง; เข็มสักหัวแม็กนั่ม; เข็มเดินเส้นหัวกลม; เข็มลงสีหัวกลม
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Piercing és tetoválás > Tetoválási kellékek > Tetoválótűk: Íves magnum tetoválótűk; Magnum tetoválótűk; Kerek béléses tetoválótűk; Kerek árnyékoló tetoválótűk
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Пиърсинг и татуиране > Консумативи за татуировки > Игли за татуиране: Извити игли за татуиране „Магнум“; Игли за татуиране „Магнум“; Контуриращи игли; Игли за светлосенки
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 穿刺与纹身 > 纹身用品 > 纹身针: 弯曲纹身针排针; 纹身针排针; 纹身收口圆针; 纹身散口圆针
sv: Företag och industri > Piercing och tatuering > Tatueringsutrustning > Tatueringsnålar: Böjda magnum-tatueringsnålar; Magnum-tatueringsnålar; Runda liner-tatueringsnålar; Runda Shader-tatueringsnålar
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 人體穿孔和刺青 > 刺青器材 > 刺青用針: 弧型刺青針; 平排刺青針; 割線圓針; 打霧圓針
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Пирсинг и татуировка > Товары для татуировки > Иглы для татуировки: Иглы плоской пайки для мягкого закраса (RM); Иглы плоской пайки для закраса (M); Контурные иглы круглой пайки (RL); Иглы круглой пайки для теней (RS)
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Piercing și tatuaje > Articole pentru tatuaje > Ace pentru tatuaje: Ace pentru tatuaje Magnum curbate; Ace pentru tatuaje Magnum; Ace pentru tatuaje rotunde pentru linii; Ace pentru tatuaje rotunde pentru umbre
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Piercing e tatuagens > Artigos para tatuagem > Agulhas de tatuagem: Agulhas curvadas de tatuagem Magnum; Agulhas de tatuagem Magnum; Agulhas de tatuagem de delinear redondas; Agulhas de tatuagem de sombrear redondas
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Piercing i tetoviranje > Pribor za tetoviranje > Igle za tetoviranje: Zakrivljene magnum igle za tetoviranje; Magnum igle za tetoviranje; Okrugle igle za tetoviranje; Okrugle igle za sjenčanje
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Piercing & τατουάζ > Προμήθειες για τατουάζ > Βελόνες τατουάζ: Καμπύλες βελόνες τατουάζ Magnum; Βελόνες τατουάζ Magnum; Βελόνες τατουάζ για γραμμές; Βελόνες τατουάζ για σκίαση
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Piercing e tatuagem > Suprimentos para tatuagens > Agulhas para tatuagem: Agulhas curvadas de tatuagem Magnum; Agulhas de tatuagem Magnum; Agulhas para tatuagem com liner redondo; Agulhas para tatuagem com shader redondo
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 피어싱/문신 > 문신 용품 > 문신 바늘: 커브드 매그넘 문신 바늘; 매그넘 문신 바늘; 라운드 라이너 문신 바늘; 라운드 셰이더 문신 바늘
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Piercing & Tätowieren > Tätowierbedarf > Tätowiernadeln: Gebogene Magnum-Tätowiernadeln; Magnum-Tätowiernadeln; Round Liner-Tätowiernadeln; Round Shader-Tätowiernadeln
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Auskarų vėrimas ir tatuiruotės > Tatuiravimo reikmenys > Tatuiravimo adatos: Lenktos „Magnum“ tatuiravimo adatos; „Magnum“ tatuiravimo adatos; Apvalios tatuiravimo adatos kontūrams; Apvalios tatuiravimo adatos šešėliavimui
en: Business & Industrial > Piercing & Tattooing > Tattooing Supplies > Tattooing Needles: Curved Magnum Tattooing Needles; Magnum Tattooing Needles; Round Liner Tattooing Needles; Round Shader Tattooing Needles
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lävistykset ja tatuointi > Tatuointitarvikkeet > Tatuointineulat: Kaarevat magnum-kokoiset tatuointineulat; Magnum-kokoiset tatuointineulat; Pyöreäkärkiset ääriviivatatuointineulat; Pyöreäkärkiset varjotatuointineulat
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Pirsing in tetoviranje > Pripomočki za tetoviranje > Igle za tetoviranje: Ukrivljene magnum igle za tetoviranje; Magnum igle za tetoviranje; Okrogle igle za tetoviranje za vrisovanje črt; Okrogle igle za tetoviranje s senčenjem
ja: ビジネス・産業 > ピアス・タトゥー > タトゥー用品 > タトゥーニードル: カーブマグナム タトゥーニードル; マグナム タトゥーニードル; ラウンドライナータトゥーニードル; ラウンドシェーダータトゥーニードル
da: Erhverv og industri > Piercing og tatovering > Tatoveringsudstyr > Tatoveringsnåle: Buede store tatoveringsnåle; Store tatoveringsnåle; Tatoveringsnåle med rund liner; Tatoveringsnåle med rund skygge
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Piercing en tatoeages > Tatoeagebenodigdheden > Tatoeagenaalden: Gebogen Magnum-tatoeagenaalden; Magnum-tatoeagenaalden; Ronde liner-tatoeagenaalden; Ronde shader-tatoeagenaalden